Tennessee, session 114, HB0574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-7-112, is amended by designating
subsection (c) as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following new subdivision (c)(2):
(2) "Evidence of identification," as described in subdivision (c)(1), does not
include a license, identification card, passport, or other document that has expired or
that is invalid for any reason.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, a county election commission shall not
register a person to vote unless the applicant has provided proof satisfactory to the
respective commission that the person holds valid, unexpired evidence of identification
as described in § 2-7-112(c)(1) at the time of processing the applicant's application to
register.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0574
001326
- 1 -